Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 1 Composition of Senate
The thirty-sixth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of North Kingstown bounded by a line beginning at the Warwick — North Kingstown boundary line and Potowomut Rd; thence southerly on Potowomut Rd to Essex Rd; thence easterly on Essex Rd to Potter Rd; thence southerly on Potter Rd to Sandhill Brook; thence southwesterly on Sandhill Brook to Chadsey Rd; thence northerly on Chadsey Rd to Post Rd; thence southerly on Post Rd to Cocumcussoc Brook; thence westerly on Cocumcussoc Brook to Amtrak RR; thence southerly on Amtrak RR to Colonel Rodman Highway; thence southerly on Colonel Rodman Highway to US Highway 1; thence southerly on US Highway 1 to State Route 138; thence easterly on State Route 138 to the Mattatuxet River; thence southerly on the Mattatuxet River to the Pettaquamscutt River; thence southerly on the Pettaquamscut River to the North Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line; thence easterly on the North Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line to the North Kingstown — Jamestown boundary line; thence northerly on the North Kingstown — Jamestown boundary line to the North Kingstown — Portsmouth boundary line; thence northerly on the North Kingstown — Portsmouth boundary line to the Warwick — North Kingstown boundary line; thence westerly on the Warwick — North Kingstown boundary line to the point of origin.

Thirty-seventh district:
The thirty-seventh senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the town of South Kingstown bounded by a line beginning at the place where the South Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line and US Highway 1 and Upper Pond; thence southwesterly on the South Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line and its extension to the point where Rhode Island bounds New Shoreham; thence northerly from the point where Rhode Island bounds New Shoreham to the line extending from the end of Green Hill Ocean Dr to the shore; thence easterly on Green Hill Ocean Dr to Green Hill Beach Rd; thence northerly on Green Hill Beach Rd to Post Rd; thence northeasterly on Post Rd to US Highway 1; thence easterly on US Highway 1 to Moonstone Beach Rd; thence northerly on Moonstone Beach Rd to Post Rd; thence easterly on Post Rd to Red House Rd; thence northerly on Red House Rd to Sands Plain Trl; thence westerly on Sands Plain Trl to census block 440090513041037; thence northerly, westerly and southerly on the northern boundary lines of census blocks 440090513041037 and 440090513041031 to the Charlestown — South Kingstown boundary line; thence northerly on the Charlestown — South Kingstown boundary line to the Richmond — South Kingstown boundary line; thence northerly on the Richmond — South Kingstown boundary line to the Exeter — South Kingstown boundary line; thence southeasterly on the Exeter — South Kingstown boundary line to the North Kingstown — South Kingstown boundary line; thence easterly on the North Kingstown — South Kingstown boundary line to US Highway 1; thence southerly on US Highway 1 to Old Tower Hill Rd; thence westerly on Old Tower Hill Rd to Main St; thence westerly on Main St to Woodruff Ave; thence southerly on Woodruff Ave to the William C. O’Neill Bike Path; thence northwesterly on the William C. O’Neill Bike Path to Cemetery Ln; thence westerly on Cemetery Ln to High St; thence southerly on High St to Main St; thence northerly on Main St to the Saugatuck River; thence southerly on the Saugatuck River to census block 440090512021042; thence northerly on the western boundary line of census block 440090512021042 to Kenyon Ave; thence southeasterly on Kenyon Ave to Salt Pond Rd; thence southerly on Salt Pond Rd to US Highway 1; thence easterly on US Highway 1 to the point of origin.

Thirty-eighth district:
The thirty-eighth senatorial district shall consist of all the town of Westerly.

The thirty-eighth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Charlestown bounded by a line beginning at the Hopkinton — Charlestown boundary line and Amtrak RR; thence northerly on Amtrak RR to Burdickville Rd; thence easterly on Burdickville Rd to Shumankanuc Hill Rd; thence southeasterly on Shumankanuc Hill Rd to Kings Factory Rd; thence easterly and southerly on Kings Factory Rd to Post Rd thence easterly on Post Rd to the Charlestown — South Kingstown boundary line; thence southerly on the Charlestown — South Kingstown boundary line to the Atlantic Ocean; thence westerly on the town boundary line to the Westerly — Charlestown boundary line; thence northerly on the Westerly — Charlestown boundary line to the Hopkinton — Charlestown boundary line; thence northerly on the Hopkinton — Charlestown boundary line to the point of origin.

The thirty-eighth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of South Kingstown bounded by a line beginning at the Charlestown — South Kingstown boundary line and the Atlantic Ocean; thence northeasterly on the shoreline to the line extending from the end of Green Hill Ocean Dr to the shore; thence easterly on Green Hill Ocean Dr to Green Hill Beach Rd; thence northerly on Green Hill Beach Rd to Post Rd; thence northeasterly on Post Rd to US Highway 1; thence easterly on US Highway 1 to Moonstone Beach Rd; thence northerly on Moonstone Beach Rd to Post Rd; thence easterly on Post Rd to Red House Rd; thence northerly on Red House Rd to Sands Plain Trl; thence westerly on Sands Plain Trl to census block 440090513041037; thence northerly, westerly and southerly on the northern boundary lines of census blocks 440090513041037 and 440090513041031 to the Charlestown — South Kingstown boundary line; thence southerly on the Charlestown — South Kingstown boundary line to the point of origin.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 5, § 2, effective February 16, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 6, § 2, effective February 16, 2022.